California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) The State Water Resources Control Board and the California regional water quality control boards are the state agencies with primary responsibility for the coordination and control of water quality. The State Water Resources Control Board has primary responsibility for the administration of water rights pursuant to applicable law. The commission shall assure that proposed development and local coastal programs shall not frustrate this section. The commission shall not, except as provided in subdivision (c), modify, adopt conditions, or take any action in conflict with any determination by the State Water Resources Control Board or any California regional water quality control board in matters relating to water quality or the administration of water rights. 

Except as provided in this section, nothing herein shall be interpreted in any way either as prohibiting or limiting the commission, local government, or port governing body from exercising the regulatory controls over development pursuant to this division in a manner necessary to carry out this division. 

(c) Any development within the coastal zone or outside the coastal zone which provides service to any area within the coastal zone that constitutes a treatment work shall be reviewed by the commission and any permit it issues, if any, shall be determinative only with respect to the following aspects of the development: 

(1) The siting and visual appearance of treatment works within the coastal zone. 

(2) The geographic limits of service areas within the coastal zone which are to be served by particular treatment works and the timing of the use of capacity of treatment works for those service areas to allow for phasing of development and use of facilities consistent with this division. 

(3) Development projections which determine the sizing of treatment works for providing service within the coastal zone. 

The commission shall make these determinations in accordance with the policies of this division and shall make its final determination on a permit application for a treatment work prior to the final approval by the State Water Resources Control Board for the funding of such treatment works. Except as specifically provided in this subdivision, the decisions of the State Water Resources Control Board relative to the construction of treatment works shall be final and binding upon the commission. 

(d) The commission shall provide or require reservations of sites for the construction of treatment works and points of discharge within the coastal zone adequate for the protection of coastal resources consistent with the provisions of this division. 

(e) Nothing in this section shall require the State Water Resources Control Board to fund or certify for funding, any specific treatment works within the coastal zone or to prohibit the State Water Resources Control Board or any California regional water quality control board from requiring a higher degree of treatment at any existing treatment works.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

30413.

(a) In addition to the provisions set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 30241, and in Sections 25302, 25500, 25507, 25508, 25510, 25514, 25516.1, 25523, and 25526, the provisions of this section shall apply to the commission and the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission with respect to matters within the statutory responsibility of the latter. 

(b) The commission shall, prior to January 1, 1978, and after one or more public hearings, designate those specific locations within the coastal zone where the location of a facility as defined in Section 25110 would prevent the achievement of the objectives of this division; provided, however, that specific locations that are presently used for such facilities and reasonable expansion thereof shall not be so designated. Each such designation shall include a description of the boundaries of those locations, the objectives of this division which would be so affected, and detailed findings concerning the significant adverse impacts that would result from development of a facility in the designated area. The commission shall consider the conclusions, if any, reached by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission in its most recently promulgated comprehensive report issued pursuant to Section 25309. The commission shall transmit a copy of its report prepared pursuant to this subdivision to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission. 

(c) The commission, after it completes its initial designations in 1978, shall, prior to January 1, 1980, and once every two years thereafter until January 1, 1990, revise and update the designations specified in subdivision (b). After January 1, 1990, the commission shall revise and update those designations not less than once every five years. Those revisions shall be effective on January 1, 1980, or on January 1 of the year following adoption of the revisions. The provisions of subdivision (b) shall not apply to any sites and related facilities specified in any notice of intention to file an application for certification filed with the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission pursuant to Section 25502 prior to designation of additional locations made by the commission pursuant to this subdivision. 

(d) Whenever the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission exercises its siting authority and undertakes proceedings pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 25500) of Division 15 with respect to any thermal powerplant or transmission line to be located, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone, the commission shall participate in those proceedings and shall receive from the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission any notice of intention to file an application for certification of a site and related facilities within the coastal zone. The commission shall analyze each notice of intention and shall, prior to completion of the preliminary report required by Section 25510, forward to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission a written report on the suitability of the proposed site and related facilities specified in that notice . The commission’s report shall contain a consideration of, and findings regarding, all of the following: 

(1) The compatibility of the proposed site and related facilities with the goal of protecting coastal resources. 

(2) The degree to which the proposed site and related facilities would conflict with other existing or planned coastal-dependent land uses at or near the site. 

(3) The potential adverse effects that the proposed site and related facilities would have on aesthetic values. 

(4) The potential adverse environmental effects on fish and wildlife and their habitats. 

(5) The conformance of the proposed site and related facilities with certified local coastal programs in those jurisdictions which would be affected by any such development. 

(6) The degree to which the proposed site and related facilities could reasonably be modified so as to mitigate potential adverse effects on coastal resources, minimize conflict with existing or planned coastal-dependent uses at or near the site, and promote the policies of this division. 

(7) Such other matters as the commission deems appropriate and necessary to carry out this division. 

(e) The commission may, at its discretion, participate fully in other proceedings conducted by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission pursuant to its powerplant siting authority. In the event the commission participates in any public hearings held by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, it shall be afforded full opportunity to present evidence and examine and cross-examine witnesses. 

(f) The State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission shall forward a copy of all reports it distributes pursuant to Sections 25302 and 25306 to the commission and the commission shall, with respect to any report that relates to the coastal zone or coastal zone resources, comment on those reports, and shall in its comments include a discussion of the desirability of particular areas within the coastal zone as designated in such reports for potential powerplant development. The commission may propose alternate areas for powerplant development within the coastal zone and shall provide detailed findings to support the suggested alternatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1031, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30414.

(a) The State Air Resources Board and air pollution control districts established pursuant to state law and consistent with requirements of federal law are the principal public agencies responsible for the establishment of ambient air quality and emission standards and air pollution control programs. The provisions of this division do not authorize the commission or any local government to establish any ambient air quality standard or emission standard, air pollution control program or facility, or to modify any ambient air quality standard, emission standard, or air pollution control program or facility which has been established by the state board or by an air pollution control district.

(b) Any provision of any certified local coastal program which establishes or modifies any ambient air quality standard, any emission standard, any air pollution control program or facility shall be inoperative.

(c) The State Air Resources Board and any air pollution control district may recommend ways in which actions of the commission or any local government can complement or assist in the implementation of established air quality programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1246, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30415.

The Director of the Office of Planning and Research shall, in cooperation with the commission and other appropriate state agencies, review the policies of this division. If the director determines that effective implementation of any policy requires the cooperative and coordinated efforts of several state agencies, the director shall, no later than July 1, 1978, and from time to time thereafter, recommend to the appropriate agencies actions that should be taken to minimize potential duplication and conflicts and which could, if taken, better achieve effective implementation of such policy. The director shall, where appropriate and after consultation with the affected agency, recommend to the Governor and the Legislature how the programs, duties, responsibilities, and enabling legislation of any state agency
 should be changed to better achieve the goals and policies of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 261.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30416.

(a) The State Lands Commission, in carrying out its duties and responsibilities as the state agency responsible for the management of all state lands, including tide and submerged lands,, in accordance with the provisions of Division 6 (commencing with Section 6001), shall, prior to certification by the commission pursuant to Chapters 6 (commencing with Section 30500) and 8 (commencing with Section 30700) review, and may comment on any proposed local coastal program or port master plan that could affect state lands.

(b) No power granted to any local government, port governing body, or special district, under this division, shall change the authority of the State Lands Commission over granted or ungranted lands within its jurisdiction or change the rights and duties of its lessees or permittees.

(c) Boundary settlements between the State Lands Commission and other parties and any exchanges of land in connection therewith shall not be a development within the meaning of this division.

(d) Nothing in this division shall amend or alter the terms and conditions in any legislative grant of lands, in trust, to any local government, port governing body, or special district; provided, however, that any development on such granted lands shall, in addition to the terms and conditions of such grant, be subject to the regulatory controls provided by Chapters 7 (commencing with Section 30600) and 8 (commencing with Section 30700).

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30417.

(a) In addition to the provisions set forth in Section 4551.5, this section shall apply to the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(b) Within 180 days after January 1, 1977, the commission shall identify special treatment areas within the coastal zone to ensure that natural and scenic resources are adequately protected. The commission shall forward to the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection maps of the designated special treatment areas together with specific reasons for those designations and with recommendations designed to assist the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection in adopting rules and regulations that adequately protect the natural and scenic qualities of the special treatment areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 972, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30418.

(a) Pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000), the Geologic Energy Management Division of the Department of Conservation is the principal state agency responsible for regulating the drilling, operation, maintenance, and abandonment of all oil, gas, and geothermal wells in the state. Neither the commission, local government, port governing body, or special district shall establish or impose such regulatory controls that duplicate or exceed controls established by the
 Geologic Energy Management Division pursuant to specific statutory requirements or authorization.

This section shall not be construed to limit in any way, except as specifically provided, the regulatory controls over oil and gas development pursuant to Chapters 7 (commencing with Section 30600) and 8 (commencing with Section 30700).

(b) The Geologic Energy Management Division
 of the Department of Conservation shall cooperate with the commission by providing necessary data and technical expertise regarding proposed well operations within the coastal zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 17.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30419.

The Division of Boating and Waterways within the Department of Parks and Recreation is the principal state agency for evaluating the economic feasibility of any boating facility to be developed within the coastal zone.

If the economic viability of a boating facility becomes an issue in a coastal development permit matter or in a local coastal program or any amendment thereto, the commission shall request the Division of Boating and Waterways within the Department of Parks and Recreation to provide comment, including, but not limited to, the analysis of costs associated with conditions of approval. In cases where the Division of Boating and Waterways within the Department of Parks and Recreation desires to make any comment, it
 shall be made within 30 days of the commission’s request. The commission shall include the comment in its decision regarding a coastal development permit or local coastal program or any amendment thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 113, Sec. 11.   (AB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

30420.

Before taking any action on (1) a local coastal program or any amendment thereto, (2) any coastal development permit, or (3) any consistency determination or certification, that relates to the disposal of hazardous substances at sea, the commission shall consult with the following governmental entities:

(a) Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(b) State Lands Commission.

(c) State Air Resources Board and relevant air
 pollution control districts or air quality management districts.

(d) Department of Fish and
 Wildlife.

(e) State Water Resources Control Board and relevant California regional water quality control boards.

(f) Secretary for Environmental Protection.

(g) Governor’s Office of Planning and Research.

(h) The local government located closest to the proposed activity, or within whose jurisdiction the activity is proposed, or within whose jurisdiction there may be effects of the proposed activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 18.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30421.

State and regional agencies shall identify, assess, and, to the extent feasible and consistent with their statutory authorities, avoid, minimize, and mitigate the impacts of sea level rise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 236, Sec. 3.   (SB 1)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Implementation [30500. - 30534.]



  ARTICLE 1. Local Coastal Program [30500. - 30504.]

30500.

(a) Each local government lying, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone shall prepare a local coastal program for that portion of the coastal zone within its jurisdiction. However, any local government may request, in writing, the commission to prepare a local coastal program, or a portion thereof, for the local government. Each local coastal program prepared pursuant to this chapter shall contain a specific public access component to assure that maximum public access to the coast and public recreation areas is provided.

(b) Amendments to a local general plan for the purpose of developing a certified local coastal program shall not constitute an amendment of a general plan for purposes of Section 65358 of the Government Code.

(c) The precise content of each local coastal program shall be determined by the local government, consistent with Section 30501, in full consultation with the commission and with full public participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1009, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

30500.1.

No local coastal program shall be required to include housing policies and programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1007, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

30500.5.

(a) By July 1, 2026, the commission shall, in coordination with the Department of Housing and Community Development, develop and provide guidance for local governments to facilitate the preparation of amendments to a local coastal program to clarify and simplify the permitting process for accessory dwelling units and junior accessory dwelling units, as defined in Section 66313 of the Government Code, within the coastal zone.

(b) The commission shall, in coordination with the Department of Housing and Community Development, convene at least one public workshop to receive and consider public comments on the draft guidance before the finalization of the guidance
 document. The commission and the Department of Housing and Community Development shall post the draft guidance on their respective internet websites at least 30 days before the public workshop. The commission shall provide notice of the public workshop to all cities and counties
 within the coastal zone. The final guidance document shall be posted on the commission’s and the Department of Housing and Community Development’s respective internet websites.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   (SB 1077)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30501.

The commission shall adopt, after public hearing, procedures for the preparation, submission, approval, appeal, certification, and amendment of a local coastal program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A common methodology for the preparation of, and the determination of the scope of, the local coastal programs, taking into account the fact that local governments have differing needs and characteristics.

(b) Recommended uses that are of more than local importance that should be considered in the preparation of local coastal programs. Those uses may be listed generally or the
 commission may, from time to time, recommend specific uses for consideration by a local government.

(c) Recommendations and guidelines, which shall be periodically updated by the commission to incorporate new information as it becomes available, for the identification, assessment, minimization, and mitigation of sea level rise within each local coastal program, taking into account local and regional conditions and the differing capacities and funding available to local governments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 236, Sec. 4.   (SB 1)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30502.

(a) The commission, in consultation with affected local governments and the appropriate regional commissions, shall, not later than September 1, 1977, after public hearing, designate sensitive coastal resource areas within the coastal zone where the protection of coastal resources and public access requires, in addition to the review and approval of zoning ordinances, and the review and approval by the regional commissions and commission of other implementing actions.

(b) The designation of each sensitive coastal resource area shall be based upon a separate report prepared and adopted by the commission which shall contain all of the following:

(1) A description of the coastal resources to be protected and the reasons why the area has been designated as a sensitive coastal resource area.

(2) A specific determination that the designated area is of regional or statewide significance.

(3) A specific list of significant adverse impacts that could result from development where zoning regulations alone may not adequately protect coastal resources or access.

(4) A map of the area indicating its size and location.

(c) In sensitive coastal resource areas designated pursuant to this section, a local coastal program shall include the implementing actions adequate to protect the coastal resources enumerated in the findings of the sensitive coastal resource area report in conformity with the policies of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1331.)
-------------------------------------------

30502.5.

The commission shall recommend to the Legislature for designation by statute those sensitive coastal resource areas designated by the commission pursuant to Section 30502. Recommendation by the commission to the Legislature shall place the described area in the sensitive coastal resource area category for no more than two years, or a shorter period if the Legislature specifically rejects the recommendation. If two years pass and a recommended area has not been designated by statute, it shall no longer be designated as a sensitive coastal resource area. A bill proposing such a statute may not be held in committee, but shall be reported from committee to the floor of each respective house with its recommendation within 60 days of referral to committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1440.)
-------------------------------------------

30503.

During the preparation, approval, certification, and amendment of any local coastal program, the public, as well as all affected governmental agencies, including special districts, shall be provided maximum opportunities to participate. Prior to submission of a local coastal program for approval, local governments shall hold a public hearing or hearings on that portion of the program which has not been subjected to public hearings within four years of such submission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30504.

Special districts, which issue permits or otherwise grant approval for development or which conduct development activities that may affect coastal resources, shall submit their development plans to the affected local government pursuant to Section 65401 of the Government Code. Such plans shall be considered by the affected local government in the preparation of its local coastal program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Procedure for Preparation, Approval, and Certification of Local Coastal Programs [30510. - 30526.]

30510.

Consistent with this chapter, a proposed local coastal program may be submitted to the commission, if both of the following are met:

(a) It is submitted pursuant to a resolution adopted by the local government, after public hearing, that certifies the local coastal program is intended to be carried out in a manner fully in conformity with this division. 

(b) It contains, in accordance with guidelines established by the commission, materials sufficient for a thorough and complete review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

30511.

Local coastal programs shall be submitted in accordance with the schedule established pursuant to Section 30517.5. At the option of the local government, this program may be submitted and processed in any of the following ways:

(a) At one time, in which event Section 30512 with respect to time limits, resubmission, approval, and certification shall apply. However, the zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, and, if required, other implementing actions included in the local coastal program shall be approved and certified pursuant to the standards of Section 30513. 

(b) In two phases, in which event the land use plans shall be processed first pursuant to Section 30512, and the zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, and, if required, other implementing actions, shall be processed thereafter pursuant to Section 30513. 

(c) In separate geographic units consisting of less than the local government’s jurisdiction lying within the coastal zone, each submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), if the commission finds that the area or areas proposed for separate review can be analyzed for the potential cumulative impacts of development on coastal resources and access independently of the remainder of the affected jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

30512.

(a) The land use plan of a proposed local coastal program shall be submitted to the commission. The commission shall, within 90 working days after the submittal, after public hearing, either certify or refuse certification, in whole or in part, of the land use plan pursuant to the following procedure:

(1) No later than 60 working days after a land use plan has been submitted to it, the commission shall, after public hearing and by majority vote of those members present, determine whether the land use plan, or a portion thereof applicable to an identifiable geographic area, raises no substantial issue as to conformity with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).

If
 the commission determines that no substantial issue is raised, the land use plan, or portion thereof applicable to an identifiable area, which raises no substantial issue, shall be deemed certified as submitted. The commission shall adopt findings to support its action.

(2) Where the commission determines pursuant to paragraph (1) that one or more portions of a land use plan applicable to one or more identifiable geographic areas raise no substantial issue as to conformity with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200), the remainder of that land use plan applicable to other identifiable geographic areas shall be deemed to raise one or more substantial issues as to conformity with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200). The commission shall identify each substantial issue for each geographic area.

(3) The commission shall hold at least one public
 hearing on the matter or matters that have been identified as substantial issues pursuant to paragraph (2). No later than 90 working days after the submittal of the land use plan, the commission shall determine whether or not to certify the land use plan, in whole or in part. If the commission fails to act within the required 90-day period, the land use plan, or portion thereof, shall be deemed certified by the commission.

(b) If the commission determines not to certify a land use plan, in whole or in part, the commission shall provide a written explanation and may suggest modifications, which, if adopted and transmitted to the commission by the local government, shall cause the land use plan to be deemed certified upon confirmation of the executive director. The local government may elect to meet the commission’s refusal of certification in a manner other than as suggested by the commission and may then resubmit its revised land use plan to
 the commission. If a local government requests that the commission not recommend or suggest modifications which, if made, will result in certification, the commission shall refuse certification with the required findings.

(c) The commission shall certify a land use plan, or any amendments thereto, if it finds that a land use plan meets the requirements of, and is in conformity with, the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200). Except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a decision to certify shall require a majority vote of the appointed membership of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 16.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

30512.2.

The following provisions shall apply to the commission’s decision to certify or refuse certification of a land use plan pursuant to Section 30512:

(a) The commission’s review of a land use plan shall be limited to its administrative determination that the land use plan submitted by the local government does, or does not, conform with the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200). In making this review, the commission is not authorized by any provision of this division to diminish or abridge the authority of a local government to adopt and establish, by ordinance, the precise content of its land use plan.

(b) The commission shall require conformance with the policies and requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) only to the extent necessary to achieve the basic state goals specified in Section 30001.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1173, Sec. 13.6.)
-------------------------------------------

30513.

(a) The local government shall submit to the commission the zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, and, where necessary, other implementing actions that are required pursuant to this chapter.

(b) If within 60 working days after receipt of the zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, and other implementing actions, the commission, after public hearing, has not rejected the zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, or other implementing actions, they shall be deemed approved. The commission may only reject zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, or other implementing actions on the grounds that they do not conform with, or are inadequate to carry out, the provisions of the certified land use plan. If the commission rejects
 the zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, or other implementing actions, it shall give written notice of the rejection specifying the provisions of land use plan with which the rejected zoning ordinances do not conform or which it finds will not be adequately carried out together with its reasons for the action taken.

(c) The commission may suggest modifications in the rejected zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, or other implementing actions, which, if adopted by the local government and transmitted to the commission, shall be deemed approved upon confirmation by the executive director.

(d) The local government may elect to meet the commission’s rejection in a manner other than as suggested by the commission and may then resubmit its revised zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, and other implementing actions to the commission.

(e) If a local government requests that the commission not suggest modifications in the rejected zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, or other implementing ordinances, the commission shall not do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 17.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

30514.

(a) A certified local coastal program and all local implementing ordinances, regulations, and other actions may be amended by the appropriate local government, but no such amendment shall take effect until it has been certified by the commission.

(b) Any proposed amendments to a certified local coastal program shall be submitted to, and processed by, the commission in accordance with the applicable procedures and time limits specified in Sections 30512 and 30513, except that the commission shall make no determination as to whether a proposed amendment raises a substantial issue as to conformity with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) as would otherwise be required by Section 30512. In no event shall there be more than three of these submittals
 of proposed amendments in any calendar year. However, there are no limitations on the number of amendments included in each of the three submittals.

(c) The commission, by regulation, shall establish a procedure whereby proposed amendments to a certified local coastal program may be reviewed and designated by the executive director of the commission as being minor in nature or as requiring rapid and expeditious action. That procedure shall include provisions authorizing local governments to propose amendments to the executive director for that review and designation. Proposed amendments that are designated as being minor in nature or as requiring rapid and expeditious action shall not be subject to subdivision (b) or Sections 30512 and 30513 and shall take effect on the 10th working day after designation. Amendments that allow changes in uses shall not be so designated.

(d) (1) The executive director may determine that a proposed local coastal program amendment is de minimis if the executive director determines that a proposed amendment would have no impact, either individually or cumulatively, on coastal resources, is consistent with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200), and meets the following criteria:

(A) The local government, at least 21 days prior to the date of submitting the proposed amendment to the executive director, has provided public notice, and provided a copy to the commission, that specifies the dates and places where comments will be accepted on the proposed amendment, contains a brief description of the proposed amendment, and states the address where copies of the proposed amendment are available for public review, by one of the following procedures:

(i) Publication, not
 fewer times than required by Section 6061 of the Government Code, in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected by the proposed amendment. If more than one area will be affected, the notice shall be published in the newspaper of largest circulation from among the newspapers of general circulation in those areas.

(ii) Posting of the notice by the local government both onsite and offsite in the area affected by the proposed amendment.

(iii) Direct mailing to the owners and occupants of contiguous property shown on the latest equalized assessment roll.

(B) The proposed amendment does not propose any change in land use or water uses or any change in the allowable use of property.

(2) At the time that the local government submits the proposed
 amendment to the executive director, the local government shall also submit to the executive director any public comments that were received during the comment period provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(3) (A) The executive director shall make a determination as to whether the proposed amendment is de minimis within 10 working days of the date of submittal by the local government. If the proposed amendment is determined to be de minimis, the proposed amendment shall be noticed in the agenda of the next regularly scheduled meeting of the commission, in accordance with Section 11125 of the Government Code, and any public comments forwarded by the local government shall be made available to the members of the commission.

(B) If three members of the commission object to the executive director’s determination that the proposed amendment is de
 minimis, the proposed amendment shall be set for public hearing in accordance with the procedures specified in subdivision (b), or as specified in subdivision (c) if applicable, as determined by the executive director, or, at the request of the local government, returned to the local government. If set for public hearing under subdivision (b), the time requirements set by Sections 30512 and 30513 shall commence from the date on which the objection to the de minimis designation was made.

(C) If three or more members of the commission do not object to the de minimis determination, the de minimis local coastal program amendment shall become part of the certified local coastal program upon adjournment of the commission meeting on that date.

(4) The commission, after a noticed public hearing, may adopt guidelines to implement this subdivision, which shall be exempt from review by the
 Office of Administrative Law and from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The commission shall file any guidelines adopted pursuant to this paragraph with the Office of Administrative Law.

(e) For purposes of this section, “amendment of a certified local coastal program” includes, but is not limited to, any action by a local government that authorizes the use of a parcel of land other than a use that is designated in the certified local coastal program as a permitted use of the parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 556, Sec. 1.   (AB 439)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30514.1.

The commission shall adopt the findings or provide a written explanation or written notice, as appropriate, required by Sections 30512, 30512.2, and 30513 to support its action no later than 60 days after the date on which action was taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 746, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30515.

Any person authorized to undertake a public works project or proposing an energy facility development may request any local government to amend its certified local coastal program, if the purpose of the proposed amendment is to meet public needs of an area greater than that included within such certified local coastal program that had not been anticipated by the person making the request at the time the local coastal program was before the commission for certification. If, after review, the local government determines that the amendment requested would be in conformity with the policies of this division, it may amend its certified local coastal program as provided in Section 30514.
